Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.108

Higher education classified employees—Membership in the public employees' retirement system.

(1) All classified employees employed by Washington State University on and after April 24, 1973, and otherwise eligible shall become members of the Washington public employees' retirement system to the exclusion of any other retirement benefit system at the institution unless otherwise provided by law.

(2) All classified employees employed by the University of Washington or each of the regional universities or The Evergreen State College on and after May 6, 1974, and otherwise eligible shall become members of the Washington public employees' retirement system at the institution unless otherwise provided by law: PROVIDED, That persons who, immediately prior to the date of their hiring as classified employees, have for at least two consecutive years held membership in a retirement plan underwritten by the private insurer of the retirement plan of their respective educational institution may irrevocably elect to continue their membership in the retirement plan notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, if the election is made within thirty days from the date of their hiring as classified employees. If these persons elect to become members of the public employees' retirement system, contributions by them and their employers shall be required from their first day of employment.

[ 1991 c 35 s 107.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.